Illinois, session 104th, HB2190.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 5changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 10/7)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2217)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)8    Sec. 7. (a) The Department must prescribe and publish 9minimum standards for licensing that apply to the various 10types of facilities for child care defined in this Act and that 11are equally applicable to like institutions under the control 12of the Department and to foster family homes used by and under 13the direct supervision of the Department. The Department shall 14seek the advice and assistance of persons representative of 15the various types of child care facilities in establishing 16such standards. The standards prescribed and published under 17this Act take effect as provided in the Illinois 18Administrative Procedure Act, and are restricted to 19regulations pertaining to the following matters and to any 20rules and regulations required or permitted by any other 21Section of this Act:22        (1) The operation and conduct of the facility and 23    responsibility it assumes for child care;  HB2190 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11659 AAS 21748 b1        (2) The character, suitability and qualifications of 2    the applicant and other persons directly responsible for 3    the care and welfare of children served. All child day 4    care center licensees and employees who are required to 5    report child abuse or neglect under the Abused and 6    Neglected Child Reporting Act shall be required to attend 7    training on recognizing child abuse and neglect, as 8    prescribed by Department rules;9        (3) The general financial ability and competence of 10    the applicant to provide necessary care for children and 11    to maintain prescribed standards;12        (4) The number of individuals or staff required to 13    insure adequate supervision and care of the children 14    received. The standards shall provide that each child care 15    institution, maternity center, day care center, group 16    home, day care home, and group day care home shall have on 17    its premises during its hours of operation at least 2 18    non-administrative one staff members member certified in 19    first aid, in the Heimlich maneuver, and in 20    cardiopulmonary resuscitation by the American Red Cross or 21    other organizations organization approved by rule of the 22    Department no later than 90 days after employment. Child 23    welfare agencies shall not be subject to such a staffing 24    requirement. The Department may offer, or arrange for the 25    offering, on a periodic basis in each community in this 26    State in cooperation with the American Red Cross, the   HB2190 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11659 AAS 21748 b1    American Heart Association, or other appropriate 2    organizations organization, voluntary programs to train 3    operators of foster family homes and day care homes in 4    first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation;5        (5) The appropriateness, safety, cleanliness, and 6    general adequacy of the premises, including maintenance of 7    adequate fire prevention and health standards conforming 8    to State laws and municipal codes to provide for the 9    physical comfort, care, and well-being of children 10    received;11        (6) Provisions for food, clothing, educational 12    opportunities, program, equipment and individual supplies 13    to assure the healthy physical, mental, and spiritual 14    development of children served;15        (7) Provisions to safeguard the legal rights of 16    children served;17        (8) Maintenance of records pertaining to the 18    admission, progress, health, and discharge of children, 19    including, for day care centers and day care homes, 20    records indicating each child has been immunized as 21    required by State regulations. The Department shall 22    require proof that children enrolled in a facility have 23    been immunized against Haemophilus Influenzae B (HIB);24        (9) Filing of reports with the Department;25        (10) Discipline of children;26        (11) Protection and fostering of the particular   HB2190 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11659 AAS 21748 b1    religious faith of the children served;2        (12) Provisions prohibiting firearms on day care 3    center premises except in the possession of peace 4    officers;5        (13) Provisions prohibiting handguns on day care home 6    premises except in the possession of peace officers or 7    other adults who must possess a handgun as a condition of 8    employment and who reside on the premises of a day care 9    home;10        (14) Provisions requiring that any firearm permitted 11    on day care home premises, except handguns in the 12    possession of peace officers, shall be kept in a 13    disassembled state, without ammunition, in locked storage, 14    inaccessible to children and that ammunition permitted on 15    day care home premises shall be kept in locked storage 16    separate from that of disassembled firearms, inaccessible 17    to children;18        (15) Provisions requiring notification of parents or 19    guardians enrolling children at a day care home of the 20    presence in the day care home of any firearms and 21    ammunition and of the arrangements for the separate, 22    locked storage of such firearms and ammunition;23        (16) Provisions requiring all licensed child care 24    facility employees who care for newborns and infants to 25    complete training every 3 years on the nature of sudden 26    unexpected infant death (SUID), sudden infant death   HB2190 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 11659 AAS 21748 b1    syndrome (SIDS), and the safe sleep recommendations of the 2    American Academy of Pediatrics; and 3        (17) With respect to foster family homes, provisions 4    requiring the Department to review quality of care 5    concerns and to consider those concerns in determining 6    whether a foster family home is qualified to care for 7    children. 8    By July 1, 2022, all licensed day care home providers, 9licensed group day care home providers, and licensed day care 10center directors and classroom staff shall participate in at 11least one training that includes the topics of early childhood 12social emotional learning, infant and early childhood mental 13health, early childhood trauma, or adverse childhood 14experiences. Current licensed providers, directors, and 15classroom staff shall complete training by July 1, 2022 and 16shall participate in training that includes the above topics 17at least once every 3 years. 18    (b) If, in a facility for general child care, there are 19children diagnosed as mentally ill or children diagnosed as 20having an intellectual or physical disability, who are 21determined to be in need of special mental treatment or of 22nursing care, or both mental treatment and nursing care, the 23Department shall seek the advice and recommendation of the 24Department of Human Services, the Department of Public Health, 25or both Departments regarding the residential treatment and 26nursing care provided by the institution.  HB2190 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 11659 AAS 21748 b1    (c) The Department shall investigate any person applying 2to be licensed as a foster parent to determine whether there is 3any evidence of current drug or alcohol abuse in the 4prospective foster family. The Department shall not license a 5person as a foster parent if drug or alcohol abuse has been 6identified in the foster family or if a reasonable suspicion 7of such abuse exists, except that the Department may grant a 8foster parent license to an applicant identified with an 9alcohol or drug problem if the applicant has successfully 10participated in an alcohol or drug treatment program, 11self-help group, or other suitable activities and if the 12Department determines that the foster family home can provide 13a safe, appropriate environment and meet the physical and 14emotional needs of children.15    (d) The Department, in applying standards prescribed and 16published, as herein provided, shall offer consultation 17through employed staff or other qualified persons to assist 18applicants and licensees in meeting and maintaining minimum 19requirements for a license and to help them otherwise to 20achieve programs of excellence related to the care of children 21served. Such consultation shall include providing information 22concerning education and training in early childhood 23development to providers of day care home services. The 24Department may provide or arrange for such education and 25training for those providers who request such assistance.26    (e) The Department shall distribute copies of licensing   HB2190 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 11659 AAS 21748 b1standards to all licensees and applicants for a license. Each 2licensee or holder of a permit shall distribute copies of the 3appropriate licensing standards and any other information 4required by the Department to child care facilities under its 5supervision. Each licensee or holder of a permit shall 6maintain appropriate documentation of the distribution of the 7standards. Such documentation shall be part of the records of 8the facility and subject to inspection by authorized 9representatives of the Department.10    (f) The Department shall prepare summaries of day care 11licensing standards. Each licensee or holder of a permit for a 12day care facility shall distribute a copy of the appropriate 13summary and any other information required by the Department, 14to the legal guardian of each child cared for in that facility 15at the time when the child is enrolled or initially placed in 16the facility. The licensee or holder of a permit for a day care 17facility shall secure appropriate documentation of the 18distribution of the summary and brochure. Such documentation 19shall be a part of the records of the facility and subject to 20inspection by an authorized representative of the Department.21    (g) The Department shall distribute to each licensee and 22holder of a permit copies of the licensing or permit standards 23applicable to such person's facility. Each licensee or holder 24of a permit shall make available by posting at all times in a 25common or otherwise accessible area a complete and current set 26of licensing standards in order that all employees of the   HB2190 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 11659 AAS 21748 b1facility may have unrestricted access to such standards. All 2employees of the facility shall have reviewed the standards 3and any subsequent changes. Each licensee or holder of a 4permit shall maintain appropriate documentation of the current 5review of licensing standards by all employees. Such records 6shall be part of the records of the facility and subject to 7inspection by authorized representatives of the Department.8    (h) Any standards involving physical examinations, 9immunization, or medical treatment shall include appropriate 10exemptions for children whose parents object thereto on the 11grounds that they conflict with the tenets and practices of a 12recognized church or religious organization, of which the 13parent is an adherent or member, and for children who should 14not be subjected to immunization for clinical reasons.15    (i) The Department, in cooperation with the Department of 16Public Health, shall work to increase immunization awareness 17and participation among parents of children enrolled in day 18care centers and day care homes by publishing on the 19Department's website information about the benefits of 20immunization against vaccine preventable diseases, including 21influenza and pertussis. The information for vaccine 22preventable diseases shall include the incidence and severity 23of the diseases, the availability of vaccines, and the 24importance of immunizing children and persons who frequently 25have close contact with children. The website content shall be 26reviewed annually in collaboration with the Department of   HB2190 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 11659 AAS 21748 b1Public Health to reflect the most current recommendations of 2the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices (ACIP). The 3Department shall work with day care centers and day care homes 4licensed under this Act to ensure that the information is 5annually distributed to parents in August or September.6    (j) Any standard adopted by the Department that requires 7an applicant for a license to operate a day care home to 8include a copy of a high school diploma or equivalent 9certificate with the person's application shall be deemed to 10be satisfied if the applicant includes a copy of a high school 11diploma or equivalent certificate or a copy of a degree from an 12accredited institution of higher education or vocational 13institution or equivalent certificate.14(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23.) 15    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)16    Sec. 7. (a) The Department must prescribe and publish 17minimum standards for licensing that apply to the various 18types of facilities for child care defined in this Act (other 19than a day care center, day care home, or group day care home) 20and that are equally applicable to like institutions under the 21control of the Department and to foster family homes used by 22and under the direct supervision of the Department. The 23Department shall seek the advice and assistance of persons 24representative of the various types of child care facilities 25in establishing such standards. The standards prescribed and   HB2190 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 11659 AAS 21748 b1published under this Act take effect as provided in the 2Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, and are restricted to 3regulations pertaining to the following matters and to any 4rules and regulations required or permitted by any other 5Section of this Act:6        (1) The operation and conduct of the facility and 7    responsibility it assumes for child care;8        (2) The character, suitability and qualifications of 9    the applicant and other persons directly responsible for 10    the care and welfare of children served.;11        (3) The general financial ability and competence of 12    the applicant to provide necessary care for children and 13    to maintain prescribed standards;14        (4) The number of individuals or staff required to 15    insure adequate supervision and care of the children 16    received. The standards shall provide that each child care 17    institution, maternity center, and group home shall have 18    on its premises during its hours of operation at least 2 19    non-administrative one staff members member certified in 20    first aid, in the Heimlich maneuver, and in 21    cardiopulmonary resuscitation by the American Red Cross or 22    other organizations organization approved by rule of the 23    Department no later than 90 days after employment. Child 24    welfare agencies shall not be subject to such a staffing 25    requirement. The Department may offer, or arrange for the 26    offering, on a periodic basis in each community in this   HB2190 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 11659 AAS 21748 b1    State in cooperation with the American Red Cross, the 2    American Heart Association, or other appropriate 3    organizations organization, voluntary programs to train 4    operators of foster family homes and day care homes in 5    first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation;6        (5) The appropriateness, safety, cleanliness, and 7    general adequacy of the premises, including maintenance of 8    adequate fire prevention and health standards conforming 9    to State laws and municipal codes to provide for the 10    physical comfort, care, and well-being of children 11    received;12        (6) Provisions for food, clothing, educational 13    opportunities, program, equipment and individual supplies 14    to assure the healthy physical, mental, and spiritual 15    development of children served;16        (7) Provisions to safeguard the legal rights of 17    children served;18        (8) Maintenance of records pertaining to the 19    admission, progress, health, and discharge of children. 20    The Department shall require proof that children enrolled 21    in a facility (other than a day care center, day care home, 22    or group day care home) have been immunized against 23    Haemophilus Influenzae B (HIB);24        (9) Filing of reports with the Department;25        (10) Discipline of children;26        (11) Protection and fostering of the particular   HB2190 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 11659 AAS 21748 b1    religious faith of the children served;2        (12) (Blank);3        (13) (Blank);4        (14) (Blank);5        (15) (Blank);6        (16) Provisions requiring all licensed child care 7    facility employees who care for newborns and infants to 8    complete training every 3 years on the nature of sudden 9    unexpected infant death (SUID), sudden infant death 10    syndrome (SIDS), and the safe sleep recommendations of the 11    American Academy of Pediatrics (other than employees of a 12    day care center, day care home, or group day care home); 13    and 14        (17) With respect to foster family homes, provisions 15    requiring the Department to review quality of care 16    concerns and to consider those concerns in determining 17    whether a foster family home is qualified to care for 18    children. 19    (b) If, in a facility for general child care (other than a 20day care center, day care home, or group day care home), there 21are children diagnosed as mentally ill or children diagnosed 22as having an intellectual or physical disability, who are 23determined to be in need of special mental treatment or of 24nursing care, or both mental treatment and nursing care, the 25Department shall seek the advice and recommendation of the 26Department of Human Services, the Department of Public Health,   HB2190 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 11659 AAS 21748 b1or both Departments regarding the residential treatment and 2nursing care provided by the institution.3    (c) The Department shall investigate any person applying 4to be licensed as a foster parent to determine whether there is 5any evidence of current drug or alcohol abuse in the 6prospective foster family. The Department shall not license a 7person as a foster parent if drug or alcohol abuse has been 8identified in the foster family or if a reasonable suspicion 9of such abuse exists, except that the Department may grant a 10foster parent license to an applicant identified with an 11alcohol or drug problem if the applicant has successfully 12participated in an alcohol or drug treatment program, 13self-help group, or other suitable activities and if the 14Department determines that the foster family home can provide 15a safe, appropriate environment and meet the physical and 16emotional needs of children.17    (d) The Department, in applying standards prescribed and 18published, as herein provided, shall offer consultation 19through employed staff or other qualified persons to assist 20applicants and licensees (other than applicants and licensees 21of a day care center, day care home, or group day care home) in 22meeting and maintaining minimum requirements for a license and 23to help them otherwise to achieve programs of excellence 24related to the care of children served. Such consultation 25shall include providing information concerning education and 26training in early childhood development to providers of day   HB2190 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 11659 AAS 21748 b1care home services. The Department may provide or arrange for 2such education and training for those providers who request 3such assistance (other than providers at a day care center, 4day care home, or group day care home).5    (e) The Department shall distribute copies of licensing 6standards to all licensees and applicants for a license (other 7than licensees and applicants of a day care center, day care 8home, or group day care home). Each licensee or holder of a 9permit shall distribute copies of the appropriate licensing 10standards and any other information required by the Department 11to child care facilities under its supervision. Each licensee 12or holder of a permit shall maintain appropriate documentation 13of the distribution of the standards. Such documentation shall 14be part of the records of the facility and subject to 15inspection by authorized representatives of the Department.16    (f) (Blank).17    (g) The Department shall distribute to each licensee and 18holder of a permit copies of the licensing or permit standards 19applicable to such person's facility (other than a day care 20center, day care home, or group day care home). Each licensee 21or holder of a permit shall make available by posting at all 22times in a common or otherwise accessible area a complete and 23current set of licensing standards in order that all employees 24of the facility may have unrestricted access to such 25standards. All employees of the facility shall have reviewed 26the standards and any subsequent changes. Each licensee or   HB2190 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 11659 AAS 21748 b1holder of a permit shall maintain appropriate documentation of 2the current review of licensing standards by all employees. 3Such records shall be part of the records of the facility and 4subject to inspection by authorized representatives of the 5Department.6    (h) Any standards (other than standards of a day care 7center, day care home, or group day care home) involving 8physical examinations, immunization, or medical treatment 9shall include appropriate exemptions for children whose 10parents object thereto on the grounds that they conflict with 11the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious 12organization, of which the parent is an adherent or member, 13and for children who should not be subjected to immunization 14for clinical reasons.15    (i) (Blank).16    (j) (Blank).17(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 18103-594, eff. 7-1-26.) 19    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 20changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 21that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 22represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 23not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 24made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 25Public Act.